Missouri, session 2026, HB2045.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.690, to read as follows:
1.690. 1. There is hereby created the "Study Commission on Grandparents
Raising Grandchildren" to address the challenges that arise when grandparents raise
their grandchildren.
2. (1) The membership of the study commission shall consist of all of the
following:
(a) Three members appointed by the governor, including each of the following:
a. One member representing the faith community;
b. One member representing a family public policy organization; and
c. One grandparent who is currently raising a grandchild or grandchildren;
(b) One member appointed by the lieutenant governor;
(c) One member appointed by the attorney general;
(d) One member of the senate appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate;
(e) One member of the senate appointed by the minority floor leader of the
senate;
(f) One member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2045 2
(g) One member of the house of representatives appointed by the minority floor
leader of the house of representatives;
(h) One member appointed by the chief justice of the Missouri supreme court;
(i) One member appointed by the Missouri Association of Prosecuting
Attorneys;
(j) The director of the department of health and senior services or his or her
designee;
(k) The director of the department of social services or his or her designee;
(l) The director of the department of mental health or his or her designee;
(m) One member appointed by AARP Missouri;
(n) One member appointed by the Central Missouri Foster Care and Adoption
Association;
(o) One member appointed by Big Brothers Big Sisters located in this state; and
(p) Any additional members as determined by a majority vote of the study
commission membership.
(2) The appointing authorities shall coordinate their appointments to assure the
study commission membership is inclusive and reflects the racial, gender, geographic,
urban, rural, and economic diversity of the state.
3. (1) The lieutenant governor shall call the first meeting of the study
commission, at which the members shall elect a chair and a vice chair from among the
membership. The study commission may then meet as necessary to conduct business.
(2) The clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate shall
provide administrative and other assistance for the work of the study commission as
necessary.
4. (1) The legislative members of the study commission shall be entitled to their
legislative compensation, per diem, and travel expenses for each day the members
attend a meeting of the study commission.
(2) The nonlegislative members of the study commission shall serve without
compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses in attending meetings of
the study commission under the policies of their respective appointing authority.
5. The study commission shall prepare a report of its findings, conclusions, and
recommendations to the general assembly no later than January 15, 2027. Upon filing
its report with the general assembly, the study commission shall stand dissolved and
discharged of any future duties and liabilities.
✔